hr-HR: Kompatibilan glasovni asistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Asistent; Nema; Radi s Sonos Voice; Ostalo
th: ผู้ช่วยเสียงที่เข้ากันได้: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; ไม่มี; ใช้งานกับ Sonos Voice; อื่นๆ
fr: Assistant vocal compatible: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Aucune; Compatible avec Sonos Voice; Autre
en: Compatible voice assistant: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; None; Works with Sonos Voice; Other
cs: Kompatibilní hlasový asistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Asistent; Žádný; Funguje se Sonos Voice; Jiné
es: Asistente de voz compatible: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Ninguno; Compatible con Sonos Voice; Otros
pt-BR: Assistente de voz compatível: Amazon Alexa; Siri da Apple; Google Assistente; Nenhum; Funciona com Sonos Voice; Outro
zh-CN: 兼容的语音助手: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; 无; 支持 Sonos Voice; 其他
nb: Kompatibel stemmeassistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Ingen; Fungerer med Sonos Voice; Annet
nl: Compatibele spraakassistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Geen; Werkt met Sonos Voice; Andere
de: Kompatibler Sprachassistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Keine; Funktioniert mit Sonos Voice; Sonstiges
ko: 호환 음성 어시스턴트: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; 없음; Sonos Voice 호환; 기타
pl: Kompatybilny asystent głosowy: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Asystent Google; Brak; Współpracuje z Sonos Voice; Inne
pt-PT: Assistente de voz compatível: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Nenhum; Funciona com Sonos Voice; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместим гласов асистент: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Няма; Работи със Sonos Voice; Други
el: Συμβατός φωνητικός βοηθός: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Καμία; Λειτουργεί με Sonos Voice; Άλλο
zh-TW: 相容的語音助理: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google 助理; 無; 支援 Sonos Voice; 其他
ru: Совместимый голосовой помощник: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Нет; Работает с Sonos Voice; Другой
sv: Kompatibel röstassistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Inga; Fungerar med Sonos Voice; Övrigt
da: Kompatibel stemmeassistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Ingen; Fungerer med Sonos Voice; Andet
vi: Trợ lý giọng nói tương thích: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Không có; Hoạt động với Sonos Voice; Khác
fi: Yhteensopiva ääniavustaja: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Ei mitään; Toimii Sonos Voice -palvelun kanssa; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinamas balso asistentas: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google asistentas; Nėra; Veikia su Sonos Voice; Kita
sl-SI: Združljiv glasovni pomočnik: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google pomočnik; Brez; Deluje s Sonos glasom; Drugo
tr: Uyumlu sesli asistan: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Asistan; Hiçbiri; Sonos Voice ile çalışır; Diğer
it: Assistente vocale compatibile: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Nessuna; Compatibile con Sonos Voice; Altro
ro-RO: Asistent vocal compatibil: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Niciuna; Funcționează cu Sonos Voice; Altele
sk-SK: Kompatibilný hlasový asistent: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Assistant; Žiadny; Kompatibilný so Sonos Voice; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis hangasszisztens: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google Asszisztens; Egyik sem; Kompatibilis a Sonos Voice-szal; Egyéb
ja: 対応音声アシスタント: Amazon Alexa; Apple Siri; Google アシスタント; なし; Sonos Voice 対応; その他